Missouri, session 2026, SB939.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 174.300, 174.332, 174.450, 174.453,
174.610, 175.020, and 178.632, RSMo, are repealed and seven new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
174.300, 174.332, 174.450, 174.453, 174.610, 175.020, and
178.632, to read as follows:
174.300. 1. Prior to October 17, 1978, the governor
shall, with the advice and consent of the senate, appoint a
six-member board of regents to assume the general control
and management of Harris-Stowe College. The members of the
board shall serve for terms of six years each, except for
the members first appointed, two of whom shall serve two-
year terms, two of whom shall serve four-year terms, and two
of whom shall serve six-year terms. Not more than three of
the regents shall be affiliated with any one political party
or reside in a city not within a county.
2. On and after August 28, 2005, Harris-Stowe State
College shall be known as Harris-Stowe State University, and
the provisions contained in subsection 1 of this section
shall continue to apply to the institution.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 939 2
174.332. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
174.050 to the contrary, the board of regents of Northwest
Missouri State University shall be composed of nine members,
eight of whom shall be voting members and one who shall be a
nonvoting member. Not more than four voting members shall
belong to any one political party[. Not more than two
voting members shall be residents of the same county. The
appointed members of the board serving on August 28, 2008,
shall continue to serve until the expiration of the terms
for which the appointed members were appointed and until
such time a successor is duly appointed.
2. The board of regents shall be appointed as follows:
(1) Six voting members shall be residents of the
university's historic statutory service region, provided at
least one member shall be a resident of Nodaway County. For
the sole purpose of determining the composition of the board
of regents, the university's historic statutory service
region shall consist of the counties of Atchison, Andrew,
Caldwell, Carroll, Clay, Clinton, Daviess, DeKalb, Gentry,
Grundy, Harrison, Holt, Livingston, Mercer, Nodaway, Ray,
and Worth;
(2) Two voting members shall be residents of a county
in the state that is outside the university's historic
statutory service region, as described in subdivision (1) of
this subsection, provided these two members shall not be
appointed from the same congressional district; and
(3)] or reside in a county with more than nineteen
thousand but fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than ten thousand but fewer
than thirteen thousand inhabitants. One nonvoting member
shall be a full-time student of the university, a United
States citizen, and a resident of Missouri.

SB 939 3
[3.] 2. A majority of the voting members of the board
shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business;
however, no appropriation of money nor any contract that
shall require any appropriation or disbursement of money
shall be made, nor teacher employed or dismissed, unless a
majority of the voting members of the board vote for the
same.
[4.] 3. Except as specifically provided in this
section, the appointments and terms of office for the voting
and nonvoting members of the board, and all other duties and
responsibilities of the board, shall comply with the
provisions of state law regarding boards of regents.
174.450. 1. Except as provided in subsections 2, [6]
3, and [7] 4 of this section, the governing board of the
University of Central Missouri, Missouri State University,
Missouri Southern State University, Missouri Western State
University, and of each other public institution of higher
education which, through the procedures established in
subdivision (8) or (9) of section 173.030, is charged with a
statewide mission shall be a board of governors consisting
of eight members, composed of seven voting members and one
nonvoting member as provided in sections 174.453 and
174.455, who shall be appointed by the governor of Missouri,
by and with the advice and consent of the senate. No person
shall be appointed a voting member who is not a citizen of
the United States and who has not been a resident of the
state of Missouri for at least two years immediately prior
to such appointment. Not more than four voting members
shall belong to any one political party. The appointed
members of the board of regents serving on the date of the
statutory mission change shall become members of the board
of governors on the effective date of the statutory mission

SB 939 4
change and serve until the expiration of the terms for which
such members were appointed. The board of regents of any
such institution shall be abolished on the effective date of
the statutory mission change, as prescribed in subdivision
(8) or (9) of section 173.030.
2. The governing board of Missouri State University, a
public institution of higher education charged with a
statewide mission in public affairs, shall be a board of
governors of ten members, composed of nine voting members
and one nonvoting member, who shall be appointed by the
governor, by and with the advice and consent of the senate.
The nonvoting member shall be a student selected in the same
manner as prescribed in section 174.055. [At least one but
no more than two voting members shall be appointed to the
board from each congressional district, and] Every member of
the board shall be a citizen of the United States, and a
resident of this state for at least two years prior to the
member's appointment. No more than five voting members
shall belong to any one political party. No more than four
voting members shall reside in a county with more than two
hundred sixty thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand
inhabitants. The term of office of the governors shall be
six years, except as provided in this subsection. The term
of office for those appointed hereafter shall end January
first in years ending in an odd number.
3. [If a voting member of the board of governors of
Missouri State University is found by unanimous vote of the
other governors to have moved such governor's residence from
the district from which such governor was appointed, then
the office of such governor shall be forfeited and
considered vacant.

SB 939 5
4. Should the total number of Missouri congressional
districts be altered, all members of the board of governors
of Missouri State University shall be allowed to serve the
remainder of the term for which such members were appointed.
5. Should the boundaries of any congressional
districts be altered in a manner that displaces a member of
the board of governors of Missouri State University from the
congressional district from which the member was appointed,
the member shall be allowed to serve the remainder of the
term for which the member was appointed.
6.] The governing board of Missouri Southern State
University shall be a board of governors consisting of nine
members, composed of eight voting members and one nonvoting
member as provided in sections 174.453 and 174.455, who
shall be appointed by the governor of Missouri, by and with
the advice and consent of the senate. No person shall be
appointed a voting member who is not a citizen of the United
States and who has not been a resident of the state of
Missouri for at least two years immediately prior to such
appointment. Not more than four voting members shall belong
to any one political party or reside in a county with more
than one hundred twenty thousand but fewer than one hundred
fifty thousand inhabitants.
[7.] 4. The governing board of Northwest Missouri
State University shall be a board of regents as provided in
section 174.332.
5. Not more than three voting members of the governing
board of the University of Central Missouri shall reside in
a county with more than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
seventeen thousand but fewer than twenty-one thousand
inhabitants.

SB 939 6
174.453. 1. Except as provided in section 174.450 and
in [subsection] subsections 4, 5, and 6 of this section, the
board of governors shall be appointed as follows:
(1) Five voting members shall be selected from the
counties comprising the institution's historic statutory
service region as described in section 174.010, except that
no more than two members shall be appointed from any one
county with a population of less than two hundred thousand
inhabitants;
(2) Two voting members shall be selected from any of
the counties in the state which are outside of the
institution's historic service region; and
(3) One nonvoting member who is a student shall be
selected in the same manner as prescribed in section 174.055.
2. The term of service of the governors shall be as
follows:
(1) The voting members shall be appointed for terms of
six years; and
(2) The nonvoting student member shall serve a two-
year term.
3. Members of any board of governors selected pursuant
to this section and in office on May 13, 1999, shall serve
the remainder of their unexpired terms.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section, the board of governors of Missouri Southern
State University shall be appointed as follows:
(1) [Six voting members shall be selected from any of
the following counties: Barton, Jasper, Newton, McDonald,
Dade, Lawrence, and Barry provided that no more than three
of these six members shall be appointed from any one county;

SB 939 7
(2) Two voting members shall be selected from any of
the counties in the state which are outside of the counties
articulated in subdivision (1) of this subsection;
(3)] Not more than three voting members shall be
selected who reside in a county with more than one hundred
twenty thousand but fewer than one hundred fifty thousand
inhabitants; and
(2) One nonvoting member who is a student shall be
selected in the same manner as prescribed in section
174.055[; and
(4) The provisions of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection shall only apply to board members first appointed
after August 28, 2004].
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section, the board of governors of Missouri Western
State University shall be composed of eight members
appointed as follows:
(1) Five voting members shall be selected from any of
the following counties: Buchanan, Platte, Clinton, Andrew,
and DeKalb ;
(2) One nonvoting member who is a student shall be
selected in the same manner as prescribed in section
174.055; and
(3) The provisions of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection shall only apply to board members first appointed
after August 28, 2005.
6. [(1)] Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection
1 of this section to the contrary, the board of governors of
Southeast Missouri State University shall be appointed as
follows:

SB 939 8
(a) [Two voting members shall be selected from any of
the following counties: Butler, Dunklin, Mississippi, New
Madrid, Pemiscot, Scott, or Stoddard;
(b) Two voting members shall be selected from any of
the following counties: Bollinger, Cape Girardeau, Madison,
Perry, Ste. Genevieve, or St. Francois;
(c) Two voting members shall be selected from any of
the following counties or areas: Franklin, Jefferson,
Lincoln, St. Charles, St. Louis, St. Louis City, or Warren;
(d) One voting member shall be selected from one of
the counties in the state; and
(e)] Seven voting members shall be selected, not more
than three of whom shall reside in a county with more than
eighty thousand but fewer than one hundred thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than thirteen
thousand but fewer than seventeen thousand inhabitants; and
(b) One nonvoting member who is a student shall be
selected in the same manner as provided in section 174.055.
[(2) The provisions of paragraphs (a) to (c) of
subdivision (1) of this subsection shall only apply to board
members first appointed after August 28, 2021.]
174.610. The governing board of the Truman State
University shall be a board of governors consisting of ten
members, composed of seven voting members and three
nonvoting members as provided in section 174.620, who shall
be appointed by the governor of Missouri, by and with the
advice and consent of the senate. No person shall be
appointed a voting governor who is not a citizen of the
United States and who has not been a resident of the state
of Missouri for at least two years immediately prior to such
person's appointment. Not more than four voting governors
shall belong to any one political party. Not more than

SB 939 9
three voting governors shall reside in a county with more
than twenty-five thousand but fewer than thirty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than fourteen
thousand but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants. The
appointed members of the board of regents serving on January
1, 1986, shall become members of the board of governors on
January 1, 1986, and serve until the expiration of the terms
for which they were appointed.
175.020. The board of curators of Lincoln University
of Missouri shall hereafter consist of nine members who
shall be appointed by the governor, by and with the advice
and consent of the senate. No person shall be appointed a
curator who shall not be a citizen of the United States and
who shall not have been a resident of the state of Missouri
two years next prior to his or her appointment. Not more
than five curators shall belong to any one political party,
and not more than four curators shall reside in a county
with more than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty
thousand inhabitants.
178.632. The governing board of State Technical
College of Missouri shall be a board of regents composed of
seven voting members and one nonvoting student member. Such
members shall be appointed by the governor with the advice
and consent of the senate after August 28, 1995, and after
the conditions of section 178.631 are satisfied. No person
shall be appointed to the board who is not a citizen of the
United States and who has not been a resident of the state
of Missouri for at least two years immediately prior to his
appointment. Not less than three voting members shall
belong to one of the two major political parties and not
less than three shall belong to the other major political
party. Not more than [two voting members shall reside in

SB 939 10
Osage County or other immediately contiguous counties] three
voting members shall reside in a county with more than
twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than fourteen
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
one thousand but fewer than two thousand inhabitants.
✓